Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4402
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the department needs a uniform electronic data collection system to collect and evaluate data regarding children served, the quality of child welfare services provided, and the outcomes produced by such child welfare services.

Laws 2012, LB1160, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 12.